Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
STATUTES RELATED TO MARIJUANA
SECTION 1.  ORS 475B.015 is amended to read:
475B.015. As used in ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545:
(1) “Adult use cannabinoid” includes, but  is not limited to, tetrahydrocannabinols,
tetrahydrocannabinolic acids that are artificially or  naturally derived,
delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, the optical isomers of
delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol  and any artificially derived
cannabinoid that is reasonably determined to have an intoxicating effect.
(2) “Adult use cannabis item” means:
(a) A marijuana item; or
(b) An industrial hemp commodity or product that exceeds:
(A) The concentration of adult use  cannabinoids established by the Oregon Liquor Con-
trol Commission,  in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority and the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture, by rule; or
(B) The greater of:
(i) A concentration of more than 0.3 percent total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol; or
(ii) The concentration of total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol allowed under federal law.
(3)(a) “Artificially derived cannabinoid”  means a chemical substance that is created by
a chemical reaction that changes  the molecular structure of any chemical substance derived
from the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” does not include:
(A) A naturally occurring chemical substance  that is separated from the plant Cannabis
family Cannabaceae by a chemical or mechanical extraction process;
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 1
(B) Cannabinoids that are produced by decarboxylation from a naturally occurring
cannabinoid acid without the use of a chemical catalyst; or
(C) Any  other chemical substance identified by the commission, in consultation with the
authority and the department, by rule.
[(1)] (4) “Cannabinoid” means any  of the chemical compounds that are the active constituents
derived from marijuana.
[(2)] (5) “Cannabinoid concentrate”  means a substance obtained by separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A mechanical extraction process;
(b) A  chemical extraction process using a nonhydrocarbon-based solvent, such as water, vege-
table glycerin, vegetable oils, animal fats, isopropyl alcohol or ethanol;
(c) A chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, provided that  the process does not in-
volve the use of high heat or pressure; or
(d) Any other process identified by the [ Oregon Liquor Control ] commission,  in consultation with
the [ Oregon Health ] authority, by rule.
[(3)] (6) “Cannabinoid  edible” means food or potable liquid into which a cannabinoid concen-
trate, cannabinoid extract or dried marijuana leaves or flowers have been incorporated.
[(4)] (7) “Cannabinoid extract” means a substance  obtained by separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A chemical extraction process using a hydrocarbon-based solvent, such as butane,  hexane
or propane;
(b) A chemical  extraction process using carbon dioxide, if the process uses high heat or pres-
sure; or
(c) Any other process identified by the commission, in consultation with the authority, by rule.
[(5)(a)] (8)(a) “Cannabinoid product” means  a cannabinoid edible and any other product intended
for human consumption or use, including a product intended  to be applied to the skin or hair, that
contains cannabinoids or dried marijuana leaves or flowers.
(b) “Cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate by itself;
(C) A cannabinoid extract by itself; or
(D) Industrial hemp[ , as defined in ORS 571.269 ].
[(6)] (9) “Consumer” means a person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds or uses marijuana
items other than for the purpose of resale.
[(7)] (10) “Deliver” means the actual, constructive or attempted transfer from one person to
another of a marijuana item, whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(11) “Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol” or  “delta-9-THC” means
(6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro-6H- benzo[c]chromen-1-ol.
(12) “Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid”  or “delta-9-THCA” means
(6aR,10aR)-1-hydroxy-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro-6H-benzo[c]chromene-2-
carboxylic acid.
[(8)] (13) “Designated primary caregiver” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.791.
[(9)(a)] (14)(a) “Financial consideration” means value that is given  or received either directly
or indirectly through sales, barter, trade, fees, charges, dues, contributions or donations.
(b) “Financial consideration”  does not include marijuana, cannabinoid products or cannabinoid
concentrates that are delivered within the scope of and in compliance with ORS 475B.301.
[(10)] (15) “Homegrown” means  grown by a person 21 years of age or older for noncommercial
purposes.
[(11)] (16) “Household” means a housing unit and any place in or around a housing unit at which
the occupants of the housing unit are producing,  processing, possessing or storing homegrown
marijuana, cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 2
[(12)] (17) “Housing unit” means a house, an apartment or  a mobile home, or a group of rooms
or a single room that  is occupied as separate living quarters, in which the occupants live and eat
separately from any  other persons in the building and that has direct access from the outside of the
building or through a common hall.
[(13)] (18) “Immature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not flowering.
(19) “Industrial hemp” has the meaning given that term in ORS 571.269.
[(14)] (20) “Licensee” means a person  that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090,
475B.100 or 475B.105.
[(15)] (21) “Licensee representative” means an owner, director, officer, manager, employee, agent
or other representative of a licensee, to the extent  that the person acts in a representative capacity.
[(16)(a)] (22)(a) “Manufacture” means  producing, propagating, preparing, compounding, convert-
ing or processing a  marijuana item, either directly or indirectly, by extracting from substances of
natural origin.
(b) “Manufacture” includes any packaging or repackaging of a marijuana item or  the labeling
or relabeling of a container containing a marijuana item.
[(17)(a)] (23)(a) “Marijuana” means  the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, any part of the
plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae and marijuana seeds.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp[ , as defined in ORS 571.269 ]; or
(B) Prescription drugs, as that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including  those containing one
or more cannabinoids,  that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
[(18)] (24) “Marijuana flowers” means the  flowers of the plant genus Cannabis within the plant
family Cannabaceae.
[(19)] (25) “Marijuana items” means marijuana, cannabinoid products, cannabinoid  concentrates
and cannabinoid extracts.
[(20)] (26) “Marijuana leaves” means the leaves of  the plant genus Cannabis within the plant
family Cannabaceae.
[(21)] (27) “Marijuana processor” means :
(a) A person that processes marijuana items in this state[ .]; or
(b) A person that holds a license  issued under ORS 475B.090 and processes industrial
hemp commodities or products pursuant to ORS 571.336.
[(22)] (28) “Marijuana producer” means a person that produces marijuana in this state.
[(23)] (29) “Marijuana retailer” means  a person that sells marijuana items to a consumer in this
state.
[(24)(a)] (30)(a) “Marijuana seeds” means the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana seeds” does not include the  seeds of industrial  hemp[ , as defined  in ORS
571.269].
[(25)] (31) “Marijuana wholesaler” means a person that purchases marijuana items in this  state
for resale to a person other than a consumer.
[(26)] (32) “Mature marijuana  plant” means a marijuana plant that is not an immature marijuana
plant.
[(27)] (33) “Medical grade cannabinoid product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid
extract” means a cannabinoid product,  cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid extract that has a
concentration of [ tetrahydrocannabinol] adult use  cannabinoids  that is permitted under ORS
475B.625 in a single serving of the cannabinoid  product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid
extract for consumers who hold a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475B.797.
[(28)] (34) “Medical purpose” means a purpose related to using usable marijuana, cannabinoid
products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts to  mitigate the symptoms or effects of
a debilitating medical condition, as defined in ORS 475B.791.
[(29)] (35) “Noncommercial” means not dependent or conditioned upon the provision or receipt
of financial consideration.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 3
[(30)(a)] (36)(a) “Premises”  includes the following areas of a location licensed under ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545:
(A) All public and private enclosed areas at the location that  are used in the business operated
at the location, including offices, kitchens, rest rooms and storerooms;
(B) All  areas outside a building that the commission has specifically licensed for the processing,
wholesale sale or retail sale of marijuana items; and
(C) For a location that the commission has specifically  licensed for the production of marijuana
outside a building, that portion of the location used to produce marijuana.
(b) “Premises” does not include a primary residence.
[(31)(a)] (37)(a) “Processes” means the processing, compounding or conversion of :
(A) Marijuana into cannabinoid products, cannabinoid  concentrates or cannabinoid extracts[ .];
or
(B) Pursuant to ORS 571.336, industrial hemp or industrial hemp commodities or pro-
ducts into industrial hemp commodities or products that contain cannabinoids and are  in-
tended for human consumption or use.
(b) “Processes” does not include packaging or labeling.
[(32)(a)] (38)(a) “Produces” means the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting
of marijuana.
(b) “Produces” does not include:
(A) The drying of marijuana by a marijuana  processor, if the marijuana processor is not other-
wise producing marijuana; or
(B) The cultivation and growing of an immature marijuana plant by a marijuana  processor,
marijuana wholesaler or marijuana retailer if the marijuana processor, marijuana wholesaler  or
marijuana retailer purchased or otherwise received the plant from a licensed marijuana producer.
[(33)] (39) “Propagate” means to  grow immature marijuana plants or to breed or produce
marijuana seeds.
[(34)] (40) “Public place” means a place to which the  general public has access and includes,
but is not limited to, hallways, lobbies and other  parts of apartment houses and hotels not consti-
tuting rooms or apartments  designed for actual residence, and highways, streets, schools, places of
amusement, parks, playgrounds and areas used in connection with public passenger transportation.
[(35)] (41) “Registry identification cardholder” has the meaning given that term in ORS
475B.791.
(42) “Total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol” or “total delta-9-THC”  means the sum of the
concentration or mass of delta-9-THCA multiplied by 0.877 plus the concentration  or mass
of delta-9-THC.
[(36)(a)] (43)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) Marijuana seeds;
(B) The stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(C) Waste material that is a by-product of producing or processing marijuana.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 475B.025 is amended to read:
475B.025. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission has the  duties, functions and powers
specified in ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 and the powers necessary or proper to  enable the commission
to carry out the commission’s duties, functions and powers  under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545. The
jurisdiction, supervision, duties, functions  and powers of the commission extend to any person that
produces, processes, transports,  delivers, sells or purchases a marijuana item in this state. The
commission may sue and be sued.
(2) The duties,  functions and powers of the commission specified in ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545
include the following:
(a) To regulate the  production, processing, transportation, delivery, sale and purchase of
marijuana items in accordance with the provisions of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 4
(b) To issue, renew, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew  licenses for the production,
processing or sale  of marijuana items, or other licenses related to the consumption of marijuana
items, and to permit, in the commission’s discretion, the transfer of a license between persons.
(c) To adopt, amend or repeal rules as necessary to carry out the intent and provisions of ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545, including rules that the commission considers necessary to protect the  public
health and safety.
(d) To  exercise all powers incidental, convenient or necessary to enable the commission to ad-
minister or carry out the provisions of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 or any other law of this state that
charges  the  commission with a duty, function or power related to marijuana. Powers described in
this paragraph include, but are not limited to:
(A) Issuing subpoenas;
(B) Compelling the attendance of witnesses;
(C) Administering oaths;
(D) Certifying official acts;
(E) Taking depositions as provided by law;
(F) Compelling the production of books, payrolls, accounts,  papers, records, documents and tes-
timony; and
(G) Establishing  fees in addition to the application, licensing and renewal fees described in ORS
475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105, provided  that any fee established by the commission is
reasonably calculated not to exceed the cost of the activity for which the fee is charged.
(e) To adopt rules regulating and prohibiting advertising marijuana items in a manner:
(A) That is appealing to minors;
(B) That promotes excessive use;
(C) That promotes illegal activity; or
(D) That otherwise presents a significant risk to public health and safety.
(f) To regulate the use of  marijuana items for other purposes as deemed necessary or appropri-
ate by the commission.
(g) To establish pilot programs, of not more than three years  in duration, to expand access to
marijuana for medical use for  registry identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers,
as defined in ORS 475B.791.
(h) To regulate the processing, transportation, delivery, sale and purchase  of artificially
derived cannabinoids in accordance with the provisions of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545.
(3) Fees  collected pursuant to subsection (2)(d)(G) of this section shall be deposited in the
Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS 475B.296.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 475B.090 is amended to read:
475B.090. (1) The processing of marijuana items is  subject to regulation by the Oregon Liquor
Control  Commission.
(2) A marijuana processor must have a processor  license issued by the commission for the
premises at which marijuana  items are processed. To hold a processor license under this section, a
marijuana processor:
(a) Must apply for a license in the manner described in ORS 475B.040;
(b) Must provide proof that the applicant is 21 years of age or older;
(c) If the marijuana processor processes marijuana extracts[ ,] or industrial hemp extracts,  as
defined in ORS 571.269, may not be located in an area zoned exclusively for residential use; and
(d) Must  meet the requirements of any rule adopted by the commission under subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules that:
(a) Require a marijuana processor to annually renew a license issued under this section;
(b) Establish application, licensure and renewal of licensure fees for marijuana processors;
(c) Require marijuana processed by a marijuana processor to be tested  in accordance with ORS
475B.555;
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 5
(d) Require industrial hemp commodities and products processed by a marijuana
processor to meet any  requirements for industrial hemp commodities or products established
under ORS 571.260 to 571.348 or rules adopted under ORS 571.260 to 571.348;
[(d)] (e) Allow a marijuana processor registered under ORS 475B.139 to  process marijuana and
usable marijuana into medical grade cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates  and
cannabinoid extracts in the same manner that rules adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 allow
a marijuana processor to process marijuana and usable marijuana into general use cannabinoid
products, cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid  extracts, excepting those circumstances where
differentiating between the processing  of medical grade cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concen-
trates and cannabinoid extracts and the processing of general use cannabinoid products, cannabinoid
concentrates and cannabinoid extracts is necessary to protect the public health and safety; and
[(e)] (f) Require a marijuana processor to  meet any public health and safety standards and in-
dustry best practices established by the commission by rule related to:
(A) Cannabinoid edibles;
(B) Cannabinoid concentrates;
(C) Cannabinoid extracts; and
(D) Any other type of cannabinoid  product or industrial hemp commodity or product  identi-
fied by the commission by rule.
(4) Fees adopted under subsection (3)(b) of this section:
(a) May not exceed, together with other fees collected under ORS  475B.010 to 475B.545, the cost
of administering ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545; and
(b) Shall be deposited in the Marijuana  Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS
475B.296.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 475B.211 is amended to read:
475B.211. Except for a marijuana retailer registered under ORS 475B.146  to sell or deliver
marijuana items to a registry identification cardholder who is 18 years of age or older or as allowed
pursuant to ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 , a [ licensee or licensee representative ] person may not sell
or deliver [ a marijuana item ] an adult use cannabis item  to a person under 21 years of age.
SECTION 5.  ORS 475B.227 is amended to read:
475B.227. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Export” includes placing a marijuana item in any mode of transportation  for hire, such as
luggage, mail or  parcel delivery, even if the transportation of the marijuana item is intercepted prior
to the marijuana item leaving this state.
(b) “Marijuana item” includes an industrial hemp [ products and  commodities ] commodity or
product that [ contain more than 0.3 percent tetrahydrocannabinol. ] exceeds the greater of:
(A) A concentration of 0.3 percent total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol; or
(B) The concentration of total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol allowed under federal law.
(2) A person may not import marijuana items into this state or export marijuana items  from this
state.
(3) [ Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, ] A violation of this section  is a Class B
violation[ .], except:
(a) As provided in subsection (4) of this section; or
(b) If the item is industrial hemp and  does not exceed a total
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of one percent.
(4) A violation of this section is a:
(a) Class A misdemeanor, if the importation or exportation:
(A) Is not for consideration and the person holds a  license issued under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090,
475B.100 or 475B.105; or
(B) Concerns an  amount of marijuana items that exceeds the applicable maximum amount spec-
ified in ORS 475B.337 (1)(a) to (f).
(b) Class C felony, if the importation or exportation:
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 6
(A) Is for consideration  and the person holds a license issued under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090,
475B.100 or 475B.105;
(B) Concerns an amount of marijuana items  that exceeds 16 times the applicable maximum
amount specified in ORS 475B.337 (1)(a) to (f); or
(C) Concerns a cannabinoid extract that was not purchased from a marijuana  retailer that holds
a license issued under ORS 475B.105.
SECTION 5a.  ORS 475B.253 is amended to read:
475B.253. [(1) As used in this section, “industrial hemp” has the meaning given that term  in ORS
571.269.]
[(2)] (1)  An industrial hemp product or commodity offered for  sale by a marijuana retailer that
holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105  must carry a label that clearly identifies whether the
product or commodity is derived from hemp or marijuana.
[(3)] (2) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission may inspect the premises of a  marijuana
retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105 to ensure compliance with this section.
SECTION 6.  ORS 475B.254 is amended to read:
475B.254. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Consumer” means a person who purchases,  acquires, owns, holds or uses marijuana items
other than for the purpose of resale.
(b) “Marijuana item” includes [ industrial hemp products and commodities ] an industrial hemp
commodity or product  that [ contain more than 0.3 percent tetrahydrocannabinol. ] exceeds:
(A) The concentration of adult use  cannabinoids established by the Oregon Liquor Con-
trol Commission,  in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority and the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture, by rule; or
(B) The greater of:
(i) A concentration of 0.3 percent total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol; or
(ii) The concentration of total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol allowed under federal law.
(2) A person other than a  marijuana retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105
may not sell marijuana items to a consumer.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 475B.529 is amended to read:
475B.529. (1)  Notwithstanding the authority granted to the State Department of Agriculture
under ORS chapters 571, 618 and 633 and  ORS 632.275 to 632.290, 632.450 to 632.490, 632.516 to
632.625, 632.705 to 632.815, 632.835 to 632.850  and 632.900 to 632.985, the department may not exer-
cise authority over marijuana items or a licensee, except that ORS 618.121  to 618.161, 618.991,
618.995, 633.311 to 633.479, 633.992 and 633.994 apply to marijuana items or to a licensee.
(2) In exercising its authority under ORS chapter 616, the department may not:
(a) Establish standards for marijuana as a food additive, as defined in ORS 616.205;
(b) Consider marijuana to be an adulterant, unless the concentration of a cannabinoid in  a
cannabinoid product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid extract exceeds acceptable levels  es-
tablished by the Oregon Health Authority by rule; or
(c) Apply ORS 616.256, 616.265, 616.270  or 616.275 to cannabinoid edibles or enforce ORS
616.256, 616.265, 616.270 or 616.275 with respect to cannabinoid edibles.
(3) Subsection  (2)(b) of this section does not prohibit the department from considering
artificially derived cannabinoids to be adulterants.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 475B.550 is amended to read:
475B.550. As used in ORS 475B.550 to 475B.590:
(1) “Adult use cannabinoid” includes, but  is not limited to, tetrahydrocannabinols,
tetrahydrocannabinolic acids that  are artificially or naturally derived,
delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, the optical isomers of
delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol and any  artificially derived
cannabinoid that is reasonably determined to have an intoxicating effect.
(2) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.015.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 7
[(1)] (3) “Cannabinoid” means any of the chemical compounds that  are the active constituents
of marijuana.
[(2)] (4) “Cannabinoid  concentrate or extract” means a substance obtained by separating
cannabinoids from marijuana by a mechanical, chemical or other process.
[(3)] (5) “Cannabinoid edible” means  food or potable liquid into which a cannabinoid concentrate
or extract or the dried leaves or flowers of marijuana have been incorporated.
[(4)(a)] (6)(a) “Cannabinoid product” means a cannabinoid edible or any other product  intended
for human consumption or use, including a product intended to be applied to  a person’s skin or hair,
that contains cannabinoids or the dried leaves or flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate or extract by itself; or
(C) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269.
[(5)(a)] (7)(a) “Marijuana”  means the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, any part of the plant
Cannabis family Cannabaceae and the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269; or
(B) Prescription drugs, as  that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including those containing one
or more cannabinoids, that are approved by the United States Food and Drug  Administration and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
[(6)] (8) “Marijuana item” means  marijuana, usable marijuana, a cannabinoid product or a
cannabinoid concentrate or extract.
[(7)] (9) “Processing” means the  compounding or conversion of marijuana into cannabinoid pro-
ducts or cannabinoid concentrates or extracts.
[(8)] (10) “Producing” means:
(a) Planting, cultivating, growing, trimming or harvesting marijuana; or
(b) Drying marijuana leaves and flowers.
[(9)(a)] (11)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) The seeds, stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(B) Waste material that is a by-product of producing or processing marijuana.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 475B.555 is amended to read:
475B.555. (1) As is necessary to protect the  public health and safety, and in consultation with
the Oregon Liquor Control Commission and the State  Department of Agriculture, the Oregon Health
Authority shall adopt rules:
(a) Establishing standards for testing marijuana items.
(b) Identifying appropriate tests for marijuana items, depending on the type  of marijuana item
and the manner in which the marijuana item was produced or  processed, that are necessary to
protect the public health and safety, including, but not limited to, tests for:
(A) Microbiological contaminants;
(B) Pesticides;
(C) Other contaminants;
(D) Solvents or residual solvents; and
(E) [ Tetrahydrocannabinol ] Adult use cannabinoid and cannabidiol concentration.
(c) Establishing procedures for determining batch sizes and  for sampling usable marijuana,
cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates or extracts.
(d) Establishing different minimum standards for different varieties of usable marijuana and  dif-
ferent types of cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts.
(2) In addition to the testing  requirements established under subsection (1) of this section, the
authority or the commission may require  cannabinoid edibles to be tested in accordance with any
applicable law of this state, or any applicable rule adopted under a law of this state, related  to the
production and processing of food products or commodities.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 8
(3) In adopting rules under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949, the authority may require:
(a) A person responsible for a marijuana grow site under ORS 475B.810 to  test usable marijuana
before transferring the usable  marijuana to a registrant other than an individual who holds a reg-
istry identification card under ORS 475B.797; and
(b) A person processing marijuana to test cannabinoid products or cannabinoid concentrates  or
extracts before transferring the cannabinoid products or cannabinoid concentrates  or extracts to a
registrant other than an individual who holds a registry identification card under ORS 475B.797.
(4) In adopting rules under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, the commission may require:
(a) A marijuana  producer that holds a license under ORS 475B.070 or a marijuana wholesaler
that holds a  license under ORS 475B.100 to test usable marijuana before selling or transferring the
usable marijuana; and
(b) A marijuana processor that holds a license under ORS 475B.090 or a  marijuana wholesaler
that holds a license under ORS 475B.100 to test cannabinoid products  or cannabinoid concentrates
or extracts before selling or transferring the cannabinoid products or  cannabinoid concentrates or
extracts.
(5) The authority  and the commission may conduct random testing of marijuana items for the
purpose of determining whether a person subject to  testing under subsection (3) of this section or
a licensee subject to testing under subsection (4) of this section is in compliance with this section.
(6) In adopting rules to implement this section,  the authority and commission may not require
a marijuana item to  undergo the same test more than once unless the marijuana item is processed
into a different type of marijuana item or the condition of the  marijuana item has fundamentally
changed.
(7) The testing of marijuana items as required  by this section must be conducted by a laboratory
licensed by the commission under ORS 475B.560 and accredited  by the authority under ORS
475B.565.
(8) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the authority:
(a) Shall consider the cost of a potential testing procedure  and how that cost will affect the cost
to the ultimate consumer of the marijuana item; and
(b) May not adopt rules that are more restrictive than is reasonably necessary to  protect the
public health and safety.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 475B.600 is amended to read:
475B.600. As used in ORS 475B.600 to 475B.655:
(1) “Adult use cannabinoid” includes, but  is not limited to, tetrahydrocannabinols,
tetrahydrocannabinolic acids that are artificially or  naturally derived,
delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, the optical isomers of
delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol  and any artificially derived
cannabinoid that is reasonably determined to have an intoxicating effect.
(2) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.015.
[(1)] (3) “Cannabinoid” means any  of the chemical compounds that are the active constituents
of marijuana.
[(2)] (4) “Cannabinoid  concentrate or extract” means a substance obtained by separating
cannabinoids from marijuana by a mechanical, chemical or other process.
[(3)] (5) “Cannabinoid edible” means  food or potable liquid into which a cannabinoid concentrate
or extract or the dried leaves or flowers of marijuana have been incorporated.
[(4)(a)] (6)(a) “Cannabinoid product” means a cannabinoid edible or any other product  intended
for human consumption or use, including a product intended to be applied to  a person’s skin or hair,
that contains cannabinoids or the dried leaves or flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate or extract by itself; or
(C) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 9
[(5)(a)] (7)(a) “Marijuana”  means the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, any part of the plant
Cannabis family Cannabaceae and the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269; or
(B) Prescription drugs, as that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including  those containing one
or more cannabinoids,  that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
[(6)] (8) “Marijuana item” means marijuana, usable marijuana, a  cannabinoid product or a
cannabinoid concentrate or extract.
[(7)] (9) “Processing” means the compounding or conversion of  marijuana into cannabinoid pro-
ducts or cannabinoid concentrates or extracts.
[(8)] (10) “Producing” means:
(a) Planting, cultivating, growing, trimming or harvesting marijuana; or
(b) Drying marijuana leaves and flowers.
(11) “Total delta-9-THC” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.015.
[(9)(a)] (12)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) The seeds, stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(B) Waste material that is a by-product of producing or processing marijuana.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 475B.625 is amended to read:
475B.625. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission, in consultation with  the  Oregon
Health Authority  and the State Department of Agriculture,  shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) The maximum  concentration of [ tetrahydrocannabinol] total delta-9-THC that is permitted
in a single serving of a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract;
(b) The maximum concentration of adult use cannabinoid,  any other cannabinoid or ar-
tificially derived cannabinoid that is permitted in a single serving of a cannabinoid product
or a cannabinoid concentrate or extract;  and
[(b)] (c) The number of servings that are permitted  in a  package of  cannabinoid product or
cannabinoid concentrate or extract [ package].
(2)(a) In adopting rules under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of  this section, the [ authority] commission
shall prescribe the different  levels of concentration of [ tetrahydrocannabinol] total delta-9-THC,
artificially derived cannabinoids, adult use cannabinoids or any other cannabinoid  that  is
permitted in a single serving of a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract for:
(A) Consumers who hold a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475B.797; and
(B) Consumers who do not hold a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475B.797.
(b) In prescribing the levels of concentration of [ tetrahydrocannabinol] total delta-9-THC, arti-
ficially derived cannabinoids, adult use cannabinoids or any other cannabinoid  that is permit-
ted in a single serving of a  cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract for
consumers who hold a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475B.797, the [ authority]
commission shall consider the appropriate level of concentration  necessary to mitigate the symp-
toms or effects of a debilitating medical condition, as defined in ORS 475B.791.
(3) In adopting  rules under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949, the authority shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts transferred by  a med-
ical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475B.858 to meet the concentration  standards and
[packaging] servings per package standards adopted by rule pursuant to this section.
(4) In adopting  rules under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, the [ Oregon Liquor Control ] commission
shall require all usable marijuana, cannabinoid products and  cannabinoid concentrates and extracts
sold or transferred by  a marijuana retailer that holds a license under ORS 475B.105 to meet the
concentration standards and [ packaging] servings per package standards adopted by  rule pursuant
to this section.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 10
SECTION 11a. If Senate Bill 408 becomes law, section 11 of this  2021 Act (amending ORS
475B.625) is repealed and ORS 475B.625, as amended by section 16, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 408), is amended to read:
475B.625. (1) The Oregon Liquor  Control Commission , in consultation with the Oregon Health
Authority and the State Department of Agriculture,  shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) The maximum concentration of [ tetrahydrocannabinol] total delta-9-THC  that  is permitted
in a single serving of a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract; [ and]
(b) The maximum concentration of adult  use cannabinoid, any other cannabinoid or ar-
tificially derived cannabinoid that is permitted in a single serving of a  cannabinoid product
or a cannabinoid concentrate or extract; and
[(b)] (c)  The number of servings that are permitted in a package  of cannabinoid product or
cannabinoid concentrate or extract.
(2)(a) In adopting rules under subsection (1)(a) or (b)  of this section, the  commission shall pre-
scribe the different levels of concentration of [ tetrahydrocannabinol] total delta-9-THC, artificially
derived cannabinoids, adult use cannabinoids or any other cannabinoid that is permitted in a
single serving of a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract for:
(A) Consumers who hold a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475B.797; and
(B) Consumers who do not hold a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475B.797.
(b) In prescribing the levels of concentration of [ tetrahydrocannabinol] total delta-9-THC, arti-
ficially derived cannabinoids, adult use cannabinoids or any other  cannabinoid that is permit-
ted in a single serving of a cannabinoid product  or cannabinoid concentrate or extract for
consumers who hold a valid registry identification card issued under  ORS 475B.797, the commission
shall consider the appropriate level of concentration  necessary to mitigate the symptoms or effects
of a debilitating medical condition, as defined in ORS 475B.791.
(3) In adopting rules under ORS  475B.785 to 475B.949, the [ Oregon Health ] authority shall adopt
by rule requirements established by the  commission by rule to require all usable marijuana,
cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and  extracts transferred by a medical marijuana
dispensary registered under ORS 475B.858 to meet the concentration standards and  servings per
package standards adopted by rule pursuant to this section.
(4)(a) In adopting rules under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, the commission shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts sold  or transferred by
a marijuana  retailer that holds a license under ORS 475B.105 to meet the concentration standards
and servings per package standards adopted by rule pursuant to this section.
(b) The rules adopted by the commission under this subsection  must allow for a concentration
of up to 100 milligrams of [ tetrahydrocannabinol] adult use cannabinoid per package of cannabinoid
edibles.
SECTION 11b.
 If Senate Bill 408 becomes law, section 12 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  (1) The  amendments to ORS 475B.025, 475B.090, 475B.227, 475B.253, 475B.254, 475B.550,
475B.555, 475B.600 and 475B.625 by sections 2, 3, 5, 5a, 6 and 8 to [ 11] 11a of this 2021  Act become
operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The  Oregon Health Authority, the Oregon Liquor Control Commission and the State De-
partment of Agriculture may take any action before the operative date specified in  subsection (1)
of this section that is necessary to  enable the authority, the commission and the department to ex-
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred  on the authority, the commission and the department by the
amendments to ORS 475B.025, 475B.090, 475B.227, 475B.253,  475B.254, 475B.550, 475B.555, 475B.600
and 475B.625 by sections 2, 3, 5, 5a, 6 and 8 to [ 11] 11a of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 12. (1) The amendments  to ORS 475B.025, 475B.090, 475B.227, 475B.253, 475B.254,
475B.550, 475B.555, 475B.600 and 475B.625 by sections 2,  3, 5, 5a, 6 and 8 to 11 of this 2021 Act
become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon  Health Authority, the Oregon Liquor Control Commission and the State
Department of Agriculture may take any action before the operative date specified in  sub-
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 11
section (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the authority, the commission and  the
department to exercise, on and after the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on  the authority, the commission
and the department by the amendments to ORS 475B.025, 475B.090, 475B.227, 475B.253,
475B.254, 475B.550, 475B.555, 475B.600 and 475B.625 by sections 2, 3, 5, 5a, 6 and 8 to 11 of  this
2021 Act.
MEDICAL MARIJUANA
SECTION 12a.
 ORS 475B.876 is amended to read:
475B.876. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall maintain a  telephone hotline for the following
persons to inquire if an address  is the location of a marijuana grow site, marijuana processing site
or medical marijuana  dispensary or is the proposed location of a marijuana grow site, marijuana
processing site or medical marijuana dispensary:
(a) A person designated by a city or a county;
(b) A person designated by the Water Resources Department; [ and]
(c) A person designated by the watermaster of any water district[ .]; and
(d) A person designated by the State Department of Agriculture.
(2) The authority may disclose the address of  a marijuana grow site for purposes of this section
notwithstanding ORS 475B.882.
INDUSTRIAL HEMP
SECTION 13.
Sections 14 to 18c of  this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
571.260 to 571.348.
SECTION 14. (1) The State  Department of Agriculture shall conduct a criminal records
check under ORS 181A.195 on an individual who submits an application  for a grower license
under ORS 571.281.
(2) For the purpose of requesting a  state or nationwide criminal records check, the de-
partment may require fingerprints  of any individual listed on an application submitted under
ORS 571.260 to 571.348, including:
(a) If the applicant is a limited partnership, each partner of the limited partnership;
(b) If the applicant is a  limited liability company, each member of the limited liability
company;
(c) If the applicant is a corporation, each director and officer of the corporation;
(d) Any individual who is a partner, member, director or officer of an  entity with a fi-
nancial interest in the applicant; and
(e) Other key participants with the applicant, as identified by the department by rule.
(3) ORS 181A.195 (10) does not apply to the department for purposes of  conducting a
criminal records check under this section.
SECTION 15.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) If a person has been convicted of a felony related  to a controlled substance under
state or federal  law, the person is ineligible for a license under ORS 571.281 to grow hemp
issued by the State Department of Agriculture for 10 years following the  date of the person’s
conviction.
(b) If a licensee or an applicant, or a  person related to the applicant as described in
section 14 (2)(e)  of this 2021 Act, is convicted of a felony related to a controlled substance
under state or federal law, the department may deny, revoke or refuse  to renew a grower
license under ORS 571.281 during the 10 years following the date of conviction.
(2) This section does not apply to  a person who was registered to grow hemp with the
department before October 31, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 12
SECTION 16. Section 15 of this 2021 Act applies to  convictions entered before, on and
after October 31, 2019.
SECTION 16a. (1) A person licensed  under ORS 571.281 may, within the boundaries of this
state, transport to or receive from:
(a) A  person licensed under ORS 571.281 or a laboratory licensed under ORS 475B.560 in-
dustrial hemp or  an industrial hemp commodity that contains no more tetrahydrocannabinol
than allowed by the State Department of  Agriculture by rule if the industrial hemp or in-
dustrial hemp used in the industrial hemp commodity  originated from a crop inspected under
ORS 571.281 (7) that was found to not contain an average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration
exceeding the concentration specified by the department by rule.
(b) A person licensed under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 industrial hemp  or an
industrial hemp commodity or product that contains no more  tetrahydrocannabinol than al-
lowed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission by rule if the industrial hemp or industrial
hemp used in the industrial hemp commodity or product originated from a crop inspected
under ORS 571.281 (7) that was found to not contain an average tetrahydrocannabinol  con-
centration exceeding the concentration specified by the department by rule.
(2) Industrial hemp or an industrial hemp commodity or  product transported or received
as described in this section may not be considered a “marijuana item.”
SECTION 17.
The Oregon Liquor Control Commission, in  consultation with the State
Department of Agriculture, shall adopt rules to establish:
(1) The maximum concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a single  serving
of an industrial hemp product;
(2) The maximum concentration  of any other cannabinoid, adult use cannabinoid or ar-
tificially derived cannabinoid that is permitted in a single serving of  an industrial hemp
product; and
(3) The number of servings that are permitted in a package of  industrial hemp products.
SECTION 18. (1) As used in this section, “industrial  hemp commodities and products in-
tended for human consumption” means industrial hemp concentrates,  industrial hemp ex-
tracts and any other industrial hemp item intended for ingestion or inhalation.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall establish by rule requirements for tracking
the transfer of industrial hemp commodities and products intended for human  consumption.
The tracking described in this section may include:
(a) Associating the results from  tests performed under ORS 571.330 with the batch of
industrial hemp on which the tests were performed; and
(b) Identifying the origin and destination of industrial hemp commodities  and products
intended for human consumption transferred by a person registered under ORS 571.281.
(3) Any requirements established by the department pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section may require the use of the system developed and maintained under ORS 475B.177.
SECTION 18a. (1) The  State Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules to require that
a grower registered under ORS 571.281 accurately report to the department:
(a) That the grower does not intend to plant an industrial hemp crop  at the location for
which a registration is issued under ORS 571.281; or
(b) Any loss of all or part of an industrial hemp crop.
(2) The  rules adopted under this section must include a timeline for reporting to the de-
partment and may include other rules necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 18b.
(1) If the industrial hemp crop of a  grower registered under ORS 571.281
is found  to contain an average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that exceeds the limit
described in ORS 571.281 (7)  and the State Department of Agriculture requires the grower
to destroy or remediate the industrial hemp crop, the  grower shall provide documentation
to the department of the destruction or remediation.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 13
(2) The department shall adopt rules to carry out this section,  including rules to specify
acceptable documentation for purposes of subsection (1) of this  section and timelines for
providing the documentation to the department.
SECTION 18c. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if  a person
plants an industrial hemp crop or commits a violation of  ORS 571.260 to 571.348 prior to ap-
plying for a grower registration under ORS 571.281, the  State Department of Agriculture
shall refuse to issue a registration to the person.
(b) If the crop described in paragraph (a) of this  subsection is removed and the depart-
ment determines that the violation is resolved, the person described in paragraph  (a) of this
subsection may apply for a registration under ORS 571.281.
(2) If a person plants an industrial  hemp crop or commits a violation of ORS 571.260 to
571.348 prior to being issued a grower registration under ORS 571.281, the department shall:
(a)(A) Prioritize the person’s industrial hemp crop for inspection under ORS 571.281  (7),
if the person planted the industrial hemp crop as described in this subsection; and
(B) Require the person to enter into a corrective action plan with the department; or
(b) Refuse  to issue a registration to the person if the department determines that a
corrective action plan is insufficient to address the violation.
(3) If the person described in subsection (2) of this section  does not enter into a correc-
tive action plan pursuant to subsection (2) of  this section, the department may not issue a
registration to the person under ORS 571.281.
(4) The department may adopt rules to carry out this  section, including rules to establish
the corrective action plan described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 18d.
 Section 18 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 18.  (1) As used in this section, “industrial hemp commodities  and products intended for
human consumption” means industrial hemp concentrates,  industrial hemp extracts and any other
industrial hemp item intended for ingestion or inhalation.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall establish by rule requirements  for tracking the
transfer of industrial hemp commodities and  products intended for human consumption. The tracking
described in this section may include:
(a) Associating the results from tests performed under ORS 571.330 with the batch of  industrial
hemp on which the tests were performed; and
(b) Identifying  the origin and destination of industrial hemp commodities and products intended
for human consumption transferred by a person [ registered ] licensed under ORS 571.281.
(3) Any requirements established by the department pursuant to  subsection (2) of this section
may require the use of the system developed and maintained under ORS 475B.177.
SECTION 18e.  Section 18a of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 18a.  (1) The State  Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules to require that a grower
[registered ] licensed under ORS 571.281 accurately report to the department:
(a) That the grower does not intend to plant an industrial hemp  crop at the location for which
a [ registration] license is issued under ORS 571.281; or
(b) Any loss of all or part of an industrial hemp crop.
(2) The rules adopted under this section must include a timeline for reporting to the department
and may include other rules necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 18f.
 Section 18b of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 18b. (1) If the industrial hemp crop of a grower [ registered ] licensed under ORS  571.281 is
found to contain an average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that  exceeds the limit described in
ORS 571.281 (7) and the State Department of Agriculture requires the grower to destroy or remedi-
ate the industrial hemp crop, the grower shall provide documentation to the department of the  de-
struction or remediation.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to carry  out this section, including rules to specify ac-
ceptable documentation for purposes  of subsection (1) of this section and timelines for providing the
documentation to the department.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 14
SECTION 18g.  Section 18c of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 18c.  (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if a person plants an in-
dustrial hemp crop or commits a violation of ORS 571.260 to 571.348 prior to applying for a  grower
[registration] license under ORS 571.281, the State Department of Agriculture shall refuse to issue
a [ registration] license to the person.
(b) If the crop described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection is removed and the department de-
termines that the violation is  resolved, the person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may
apply for a [ registration] license under ORS 571.281.
(2) If  a person plants an industrial hemp crop or commits a violation of ORS 571.260 to 571.348
prior to being issued a grower [ registration] license under ORS 571.281, the department shall:
(a)(A) Prioritize the person’s  industrial hemp crop for inspection under ORS 571.281 (7), if the
person planted the industrial hemp crop as described in this subsection; and
(B) Require the person to enter into a corrective action plan with the department; or
(b) Refuse to  issue a [ registration] license to the person if the department determines that a
corrective action plan is insufficient to address the violation.
(3) If the person described in subsection (2) of this section does not enter into a  corrective
action plan pursuant to subsection (2) of  this section, the department may not issue a [ registration]
license to the person under ORS 571.281.
(4) The department may adopt rules to carry out this section, including rules to establish the
corrective action plan described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 571.260 is amended to read:
571.260. ORS 571.260 to 571.348 shall be known and may be cited as the [ Oregon Industrial Hemp
Agricultural Pilot Program and Research Act ] Oregon Hemp Act .
SECTION 20.  ORS 571.263 is amended to read:
571.263. The State Department of Agriculture shall administer  an Oregon [ Industrial Hemp Ag-
ricultural Pilot Program for the purpose of studying the growth, cultivation and marketing of industrial
hemp in this state. In carrying out the program, the department: ] Hemp State Program for the
production, processing  and sale of hemp in this state. In carrying out the program, the de-
partment:
(1) Shall administer ORS 571.260 to 571.348[ ;].
(2)(a) Shall adopt rules to  implement a state plan for the production of hemp in accord-
ance with the Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (P.L. 115-334) and subsequent federal law.
The rules adopted under this subsection must conform to, and not be  more restrictive than,
the rules related to hemp promulgated by the United States Department of Agriculture.
(b) In  adopting rules under this subsection, the State Department of Agriculture shall
include public input.
(c) The rules adopted under this subsection may include the adoption by reference of any
federal laws, rules,  regulations or guidelines, or standards, practices or requirements, re-
lated to the production of hemp.
[(2)] (3) Shall adopt by rule any  record keeping and reporting requirements necessary to ad-
minister the program[ ;].
[(3)] (4) May purchase, possess,  seize or dispose of industrial hemp products or commodities as
the department  deems necessary to enforce and ensure compliance with ORS 571.260 to 571.348 or
department rules relating to ORS 571.260 to 571.348[ ; and ].
[(4)] (5)  May exercise  any other power or perform any other function necessary to administer
the program.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 571.269 is amended to read:
571.269. As used in ORS 571.260 to 571.348:
(1) “Adult use cannabinoid” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.015.
(2) “Adult use cannabis item” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.015.
[(1)] (3) “Agricultural hemp seed” means Cannabis seed:
(a) That is sold to or intended to be sold to [ registered ] licensed growers for planting; or
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 15
(b) That remains in an unprocessed or partially processed condition that  is capable of
germination.
(4) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.015.
(5) “Consumption” means to ingest, inhale or topically apply to the skin or hair.
[(2)] (6) “Crop” means industrial hemp grown under a single [ registration] license.
[(3)] (7) “Grower” means a person, joint venture or cooperative that produces industrial hemp.
[(4)] (8) “Handler” means a person, joint venture or cooperative  that receives industrial hemp
for processing into commodities, products or agricultural hemp seed and any other activities
identified by the State Department of Agriculture by rule .
[(5)] (9)(a) “Industrial hemp”:
[(a) Except as provided in this paragraph, means all nonseed parts and  varieties of the Cannabis
plant, whether  growing or not, that contain an average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that does
not exceed 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis. The State department of Agriculture, by  rule, may adopt
any higher average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration limit established in federal law. ]
[(b) Means any Cannabis seed: ]
[(A) That is part of a crop; ]
[(B) That is retained by a grower for future planting; ]
[(C) That is agricultural hemp seed; ]
[(D) That is for processing into or for use as agricultural hemp seed; or ]
[(E) That has  been processed in a manner or to an extent that the Cannabis seed is incapable of
germination.]
[(c) Does not mean industrial hemp commodities or products. ]
(A) Means the plant species  Cannabis sativa that has a tetrahydrocannabinol concen-
tration that complies with the concentration specified by the department by rule; and
(B) Has the meaning given that term as it is further defined by the department by rule.
(b) “Industrial hemp” does not mean industrial hemp commodities or products.
[(6)] (10) “Industrial hemp concentrate”  means an industrial hemp product obtained by separat-
ing cannabinoids from industrial hemp by:
(a) A mechanical process;
(b) A chemical extraction process using a nonhydrocarbon-based solvent, such as water,  vege-
table glycerin, vegetable oils, animal fats, isopropyl alcohol or ethanol;
(c) A chemical extraction process using  carbon dioxide, provided that the process does not in-
volve the use of high heat or pressure; or
(d) Any other process identified by the department by rule.
[(7)] (11) “Industrial hemp extract” means an industrial hemp product obtained by separating
cannabinoids from industrial hemp by:
(a) A chemical extraction process using a hydrocarbon-based solvent, such as butane,  hexane
or propane;
(b) A chemical  extraction process using carbon dioxide, if the process uses high heat or pres-
sure; or
(c) Any other process identified by the department by rule.
(12) “Licensee” means a grower, handler, agricultural hemp  seed producer or other per-
son licensed under ORS 571.281.
SECTION 21a.
 If Senate Bill 96 becomes law, ORS 571.269, as amended by section 21 of  this
2021 Act, is amended to read:
571.269. As used in ORS 571.260 to 571.348:
(1) “Adult use cannabinoid” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.015.
(2) “Adult use cannabis item” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.015.
(3) “Agricultural hemp seed” means Cannabis seed:
(a) That is sold to or intended to be sold to licensed growers for planting; or
(b) That remains in an unprocessed or partially processed condition that  is capable of
germination.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 16
(4) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.015.
(5) “Consumption” means [ to ingest,  inhale or topically apply ] ingestion, inhalation or topical
application to the skin or hair.
(6) “Crop” means industrial hemp grown under a single license.
(7) “Grower” means a person, joint venture or cooperative that produces industrial hemp.
(8) “Handler” means a person, joint venture or cooperative that receives industrial  hemp for
processing into commodities, products or agricultural hemp seed  and any other activities identified
by the State Department of Agriculture by rule.
(9)(a) “Industrial hemp”:
(A) Means the plant species Cannabis sativa that has  a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that
complies with the concentration specified by the department by rule; and
(B) Has the meaning given that term as it is further defined by the department by rule.
(b) “Industrial hemp” does not mean industrial hemp commodities or products.
(10) “Industrial hemp concentrate” means  an industrial hemp product obtained by separating
cannabinoids from industrial hemp by:
(a) A mechanical process;
(b) A  chemical extraction process using a nonhydrocarbon-based solvent, such as water, vege-
table glycerin, vegetable oils, animal fats, isopropyl alcohol or ethanol;
(c) A chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, provided that  the process does not in-
volve the use of high heat or pressure; or
(d) Any other process identified by the department by rule.
(11) “Industrial hemp extract” means an industrial hemp product obtained  by separating
cannabinoids from industrial hemp by:
(a) A  chemical extraction process using a hydrocarbon-based solvent, such as butane, hexane
or propane;
(b) A chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, if the process uses high heat  or pres-
sure; or
(c) Any other process identified by the department by rule.
(12) “Licensee” means a grower, handler, agricultural hemp seed  producer or other person li-
censed under ORS 571.281.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 571.272 is amended to read:
571.272. (1) Industrial hemp is an agricultural product that is subject to  regulation by the State
Department of Agriculture.
(2)(a) For purposes of ORS chapter 616, the department may not consider  industrial hemp or
industrial hemp commodities or products to be an adulterant.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not prohibit the department from  considering
artificially derived cannabinoids to be adulterants.
SECTION 23.  ORS 571.281 is amended to read:
571.281. (1)(a) To grow or handle industrial hemp, a person must be  [ registered with ] licensed
by the State Department of Agriculture as a grower or handler.
(b) The department may identify by rule activities  related to growing or handling hemp
in addition to those described in ORS 571.269 and may require  licensure to engage in those
activities. The department may issue, renew, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or  renew
a license required pursuant to this subsection.
(2)(a) Only a grower  or handler [ registered ] licensed under this section may produce agricultural
hemp seed. For a grower or handler to  produce agricultural hemp seed, the grower or handler must
be [ registered with ] licensed by the department as an agricultural hemp seed producer.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) A grower [ registered ] licensed under this section that retains agricultural hemp seed  for the
purpose of personally propagating industrial hemp in a subsequent year is  not required to [ register
with] be licensed by the department as an agricultural hemp seed producer; and
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 17
(B) A grower or handler [ registered ] licensed under  this section that produces Cannabis seeds
that are incapable of  germination, or a handler [ registered ] licensed under this section that proc-
esses Cannabis seeds that  are incapable of germination into commodities or products, is not required
to [ register with ] be licensed by  the department as an agricultural hemp seed producer.
(3) An applicant for [ registration] a license  under this section  must submit to the department,
in a form and manner prescribed by the department, the following information:
(a) The name and address of the applicant;
(b) The name and address of the industrial hemp operation of the applicant; and
(c) Any other information required by the department by rule.
(4) [ Registration under this section is valid for a one-year term,  beginning on January 1. ] The
department shall adopt rules specifying the period  of time for which a license issued under
this section is valid.  A [ grower, handler or agricultural  hemp seed producer may renew a
registration] licensee may renew a  license under this section in a form and manner prescribed by
the department.
(5) A [ registration] license under this section is a personal privilege and is not transferable.
(6) A  grower or handler [ registered ] licensed under this section must keep records as required
by the department by rule. Upon not  less than three days’ notice, the department may subject the
records to inspection or audit during normal business hours. The department may  make an in-
spection or audit for the purpose of ensuring compliance with:
(a) A provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348;
(b) A rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348; or
(c) An order issued by the department pursuant to  a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348 or a
rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348.
(7) In addition to any inspection conducted pursuant to ORS 561.275, the department may inspect
any crop during the crop’s growth phase and take a representative composite sample for field anal-
ysis. If a crop contains an average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration exceeding [ 0.3 percent  on a
dry weight basis or a tetrahydrocannabinol  concentration exceeding the concentration allowed under
federal law,  whichever is greater ] the concentration specified by the department by rule , the
department may detain, seize or embargo the crop as  provided under ORS 561.605 to 561.620, subject
to any process established under ORS 571.345.
(8)(a) The department may charge [ growers, handlers  and agricultural hemp seed producers ap-
plication fees, registration and renewal of registration fees, administrative change fees and fees for
other services ] licensees the following fees  in amounts reasonably calculated  by the department to
pay the cost of administering ORS 571.260 to 571.348[ .]:
(A) Application fees;
(B) License and license renewal fees;
(C) Administrative change fees; and
(D) Fees for other services.
(b) Moneys from fees charged under this  subsection shall be deposited in the Industrial Hemp
Fund established under ORS 571.278.
(9) The department may adopt rules establishing public health  and safety standards and industry
best practices for growers and handlers [ registered ] licensed under this section.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 571.285 is amended to read:
571.285. (1) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the State Department of Agriculture
may revoke  [ the registration of a grower, handler or agricultural hemp seed producer ] a licensee’s
license or refuse to [ register] issue or renew the [ registration] license if a [ grower,  handler or ag-
ricultural hemp seed producer ] licensee violates:
(a) A provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348;
(b) A rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348;
(c) An order issued by the department pursuant to  a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348 or a
rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348 , including an order of detainment issued
under ORS 571.281; or
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 18
(d) Any statutory law or department rule related to agricultural activities  other than industrial
hemp operations.
[(2) The department may not discipline a grower, handler  or agricultural hemp seed producer un-
der this section on the basis that possessing, delivering and manufacturing industrial  hemp are pro-
hibited by federal law. ]
(2) The department may  adopt rules to prohibit a licensee from reapplying for a license
under ORS 571.281 for a period  of time specified by rule by the department if the licensee
violates:
(a) A provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348;
(b) A rule adopted pursuant to ORS 571.260 to 571.348; or
(c) An order issued by the department pursuant to ORS 571.260  to 571.348 or a rule
adopted pursuant to ORS 571.260 to 571.348.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 571.288 is amended to read:
571.288. A grower [ registered ] licensed under ORS 571.281 may use any propagation method,
including planting seeds or starts or the use of clones or cuttings, to produce industrial hemp.
SECTION 26.  ORS 571.294 is amended to read:
571.294. The State  Department of Agriculture may charge growers and handlers [ registered ] li-
censed under ORS 571.281 fees reasonably calculated by the department to pay the  cost of sampling
or testing industrial hemp or industrial hemp commodities or products under ORS 571.330  and
571.333. Moneys from fees  charged under this section shall be deposited in the Industrial Hemp Fund
established under ORS 571.278.
SECTION 27.  ORS 571.302 is amended to read:
571.302. (1) For purposes  of ORS 633.511 to 633.750, agricultural hemp seed is an agricultural
seed or a flower seed, as those terms are defined in ORS 633.511.
(2) The Director of Agriculture, or the director’s agent, and the Dean of  the College of Agri-
cultural Sciences of Oregon State University, or the dean’s agent, shall establish a program for  the
labeling and certification of agricultural hemp seed. For purposes of the program:
(a) The director and the dean shall perform their respective  duties under ORS 633.511 to 633.750
with respect to agricultural hemp seed in the same manner that the director and dean perform  their
respective duties under ORS  633.511 to 633.750 with respect to other agricultural seed or flower
seed, including but not limited to those duties related to labeling, testing and certifying seeds; and
(b) The director and the dean  shall exercise their respective functions and powers under ORS
633.511 to 633.750 with respect to agricultural hemp seed in the same manner that  the director and
dean exercise their respective functions and powers under ORS 633.511  to 633.750 with respect to
other agricultural seed or flower seed, including but not limited to inspecting and sampling  seeds
and making rules and regulations under ORS 633.680.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, if the director  in consultation with
the dean determines that a specific  provision of ORS 633.511 to 633.750, or a specific rule or regu-
lation made under ORS 633.511 to 633.750, that applies to  other agricultural seed or flower seed is
inadequate or not suitable for the regulation of  agricultural hemp seed, the director may by rule
exempt agricultural hemp seed from the provision, rule or regulation  and make rules providing more
adequate or suitable regulation of agricultural hemp seed.
(4)(a) The director and the dean shall collaborate with growers [ registered ] licensed under ORS
571.281 in performing their respective duties and exercising their respective functions and  powers
under ORS 633.511 to 633.750 with respect to agricultural hemp seed.
(b) The director and the dean may collaborate with growers  [ registered ] licensed under ORS
571.281 and other stakeholders to develop a heritage agricultural hemp seed for this state.
(5) The director and the  dean may collaborate with entities authorized to certify seeds under the
laws of  other states in performing their respective duties and exercising their respective functions
and powers under ORS 633.511 to 633.750 with respect to agricultural hemp seed.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 19
(6) A grower  [ registered ] licensed under ORS 571.281 is not required, for purposes related to
growing industrial hemp, to  use an agricultural hemp seed variety certified under the program de-
scribed in this section.
(7) The State Department of Agriculture may establish by rule  waivers to, or exemptions from,
tests that would otherwise be conducted to determine a  crop’s average tetrahydrocannabinol con-
centration for crops planted with agricultural hemp seed varieties certified pursuant to the program
described in this section.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 571.327 is amended to read:
571.327. (1) An agricultural hemp seed producer [ registered ] licensed under ORS 571.281:
(a) Must sell agricultural hemp seed in a manner that complies  with any standard established
by the Director of Agriculture under ORS 633.511 to 633.750; and
(b) May sell agricultural hemp seed only if  the agricultural hemp seed meets any packaging or
labeling requirement, or any quality standard,  adopted by the director under subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) The director may adopt rules  establishing packaging requirements, labeling requirements and
quality standards for agricultural hemp seed.
(3) The State Department of Agriculture shall make available to growers [ registered ] licensed
under ORS 571.281 information that identifies agricultural hemp seed  producers [ registered ] licensed
under ORS 571.281 from whom the growers may purchase agricultural hemp seed.
SECTION 29.  ORS 571.330 is amended to read:
571.330. [(1) For purposes of this section, “consumption” means to ingest,  inhale or topically apply
to the skin or hair. ]
[(2)(a)] (1)(a) A laboratory licensed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission under  ORS
475B.560 and accredited by the Oregon Health Authority pursuant to ORS  475B.565 may test in-
dustrial hemp and industrial hemp commodities and products whether or not the industrial hemp
or industrial hemp commodities or products were  produced or processed by a [ grower, handler
or agricultural hemp seed producer registered under ORS 571.281 ] licensee.
(b) An accredited independent testing laboratory that has been approved by  the authority or the
State Department of Agriculture may test industrial hemp  and industrial hemp commodities and
products whether or not the industrial hemp or  industrial hemp commodities or products
were produced or processed by a [ grower, handler or agricultural hemp seed producer registered un-
der ORS 571.281 ] licensee.
[(3)] (2) A [ grower or handler ] person may not sell or transfer an industrial  hemp commodity
or product that is intended for human consumption and that was produced, processed or manu-
factured in this state  unless the commodity or product is tested by a laboratory described in sub-
section [ (2)] (1) of this section to  ensure that the commodity or product meets the requirements
adopted by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS  475B.555 (1)(a) and (b) and (2) for testing
marijuana items.
[(4)] (3) For purposes of this section, the department shall adopt rules:
(a) Establishing protocols for the testing of industrial hemp commodities and products; and
(b) Establishing  procedures for determining batch sizes and for sampling industrial hemp com-
modities and products.
[(5)] (4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Agricultural hemp seed;
(b) Seeds of the plant genus Cannabis  within the plant family Cannabaceae that are incapable
of germination;
(c) Products derived from seeds described in paragraph (b) of this subsection; or
(d) Other parts of industrial hemp that the department identifies by rule as exempt.
SECTION 29a.
If Senate  Bill 96 becomes law, section 29 of this 2021 Act (amending ORS
571.330) is repealed and ORS  571.330, as amended by section 13, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 96), is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 20
571.330. [(1) For purposes of this section, “consumption” means ingestion, inhalation  or topical
application to the skin or hair. ]
[(2)(a)] (1)(a)  A laboratory licensed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission under  ORS
475B.560 and accredited by the Oregon Health Authority pursuant to ORS  475B.565 may test in-
dustrial hemp and industrial hemp commodities and products whether or not the industrial hemp
or industrial hemp commodities or products were  produced or processed by a [ grower, handler
or agricultural hemp seed producer registered under ORS 571.281 ] licensee.
(b) An accredited independent testing laboratory that has been approved by  the authority or the
State Department of Agriculture may test industrial hemp  and industrial hemp commodities and
products whether or not the industrial hemp or  industrial hemp commodities or products
were produced or processed by a [ grower, handler or agricultural hemp seed producer registered un-
der ORS 571.281 ] licensee.
[(3)] (2)  A [ grower or handler ] person  may not sell or transfer an industrial  hemp commodity
or product that is intended for human consumption and that was produced, processed or manu-
factured in this state  unless the commodity or product is tested by a laboratory described in sub-
section [ (2)] (1)  of this section to  ensure that the commodity or product meets the requirements
adopted by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 475B.555 (1)(a)  and (b) for testing marijuana
items and industrial hemp-derived  vapor items and ORS 475B.555 (2) for testing cannabinoid edibles.
[(4)] (3)  Industrial hemp commodities or products that are intended for use in an  inhalant de-
livery system, as defined in ORS 431A.175, must meet the requirements of ORS 475B.550 to 475B.590
and 475B.600 to 475B.655 that apply to industrial hemp-derived vapor items as  defined in ORS
475B.550 and 475B.600.
[(5)] (4) For purposes of this section, the department shall adopt rules:
(a) Establishing protocols for the testing of industrial hemp commodities and products; and
(b) Establishing  procedures for determining batch sizes and for sampling industrial hemp com-
modities and products.
[(6)] (5) This section does not apply to:
(a) Agricultural hemp seed;
(b) Seeds of the plant genus Cannabis  within the plant family Cannabaceae that are incapable
of germination;
(c) Products derived from seeds described in paragraph (b) of this subsection; or
(d) Other parts of industrial hemp that the department identifies by rule as exempt.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 571.336 is amended to read:
571.336. (1) As  used in this section, “licensee,” “marijuana,” “marijuana item” and “marijuana
processor” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 475B.015.
(2) A grower [ registered ] licensed under ORS  571.281 may deliver industrial hemp, and a handler
[registered ] licensed under ORS 571.281  may deliver industrial hemp concentrates and industrial
hemp extracts, to a marijuana processor that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.090, if:
(a) The  grower or handler and the marijuana processor are registered with the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission, in a form  and manner prescribed by the commission, for the purpose of proc-
essing industrial hemp, industrial hemp concentrates and industrial hemp extracts;
(b) The marijuana processor is  provided with the results of any test conducted on the industrial
hemp, industrial hemp concentrate or industrial hemp extract pursuant to ORS  571.260 to 571.348
as a condition of the marijuana  processor’s receiving the industrial hemp, industrial hemp concen-
trate or industrial hemp extract;
(c) The marijuana processor keeps the results of any  test that the marijuana processor receives
pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection in a form and manner prescribed by the commission;
(d) The industrial hemp, industrial hemp concentrate or industrial hemp extract  is tracked using
the system developed  and maintained under ORS 475B.177 when the industrial hemp, industrial hemp
concentrate or industrial hemp extract is delivered to the premises of the marijuana  processor; and
(e) The grower or handler and the marijuana processor meet any other  requirement established
by the commission by rule.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 21
(3) Industrial hemp, industrial hemp  concentrates and industrial hemp extracts may be processed
by a marijuana  processor registered under this section into any industrial hemp commodity or
product or used by a marijuana  processor registered under this section to supplement the processing
of any marijuana item.
(4) An industrial hemp concentrate, industrial  hemp extract, industrial hemp commodity or
product  or  marijuana item processed pursuant to this section may be delivered by a marijuana
processor registered under this section  to a licensee as described in ORS 475B.206, provided that
the industrial hemp concentrate, industrial  hemp extract, industrial hemp commodity or product or
marijuana item meets any applicable requirement for  marijuana items set forth in ORS 475B.010 to
475B.545, 475B.550 to 475B.590 and  475B.600 to 475B.655 and rules adopted under ORS 475B.010 to
475B.545, 475B.550 to 475B.590 and 475B.600 to 475B.655.
(5) The commission may impose an annual fee  reasonably calculated to not exceed the cost of
administering this section on growers registered under this section,  handlers registered under this
section and marijuana processors  registered under this section. Fees collected under this section
shall be deposited in the Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS 475B.296.
Moneys deposited in the fund pursuant  to this subsection are continuously appropriated to the
commission for the purpose of administering this section.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 571.337 is amended to read:
571.337. (1) As used in this section:
[(a) “Consumption” has the meaning given that term in ORS 571.330. ]
[(b)] (a) “Processor” means a person licensed under ORS 475B.090.
[(c)] (b) “Retailer” means a person licensed under ORS 475B.105.
[(d)] (c) “Wholesaler” means a person licensed under ORS 475B.100.
(2) [ Except as provided in ORS  571.341,] A processor, retailer or wholesaler may purchase, re-
ceive, transfer, sell or transport industrial hemp, or an industrial hemp commodity or  product that
contains cannabinoids and is intended for human consumption, only if:
(a) The processor, retailer or wholesaler received the hemp, commodity  or product from a
grower or handler [ registered ] licensed under ORS 571.281 or a processor;
(b) The grower, handler  or processor under paragraph (a) of this subsection is registered [ by]
with the Oregon Liquor Control Commission as provided under ORS 571.336; and
(c) The hemp, commodity or product  meets the requirements for marijuana items under ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545, 475B.550 to 475B.590 and 475B.600  to 475B.655 and rules adopted by the
commission.
(3) A grower, handler or processor registered as described under ORS  571.336 (2)(a) shall enter
the hemp, commodity or product that contains  cannabinoids, is intended for human consumption and
is intended for transfer, sale or transport to a processor, retailer or  wholesaler licensed under ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545 into the tracking system described in ORS 475B.177  before the hemp, com-
modity or product is transferred to a laboratory described in ORS 571.330 [ (2)] (1) for testing of a
type described under ORS 475B.555. The commission shall continue to track  the hemp, commodity
or product entered into the system under this subsection when the hemp, commodity or product is
transferred, sold or transported to a premises licensed under ORS 475B.010  to 475B.545, or to other
areas under the control of the premises licensee.
(4) A  processor may transfer, sell or transport an industrial hemp commodity or product
to a person that  is not a processor, retailer or wholesaler if the industrial hemp commodity
or product:
(a) Is tested as described  in ORS 475B.555 and otherwise meets the requirements for
marijuana items under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, 475B.550 to  475B.590 and 475B.600 to
475B.655 and rules adopted by the commission;
(b) Is entered into the tracking system described in ORS 475B.177;
(c) Prior to the transfer, sale or transport, is held by  the processor for the duration and
in the manner required by the commission by rule; and
(d) Meets any other requirements established by the commission by rule.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 22
[(4)] (5) The  State Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules regarding the activities of
growers and handlers under this section.
[(5)] (6)(a) The commission shall adopt rules regarding the  activities of processors, retailers,
wholesalers and laboratories under this section.
(b) The commission may adopt rules to carry out subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 571.339 is amended to read:
571.339. [A person may not make a retail sale of  industrial hemp commodities or products in this
state unless the industrial hemp commodities or products and the industrial  hemp used to process the
industrial hemp commodities or products meet the requirements for processing industrial hemp com-
modities or products or growing industrial hemp set  forth in ORS 571.260 to 571.348 and rules adopted
under ORS 571.260 to 571.348. ]
(1) For purposes of this  section, “consumer” means a person that purchases, acquires,
owns, holds or uses an industrial hemp commodity or product other than for the purpose of
resale.
(2) A person may not sell, transfer or deliver to a consumer an  industrial hemp com-
modity or product that contains cannabinoids and is intended for human consumption unless:
(a) The industrial hemp commodity or  product has been tested in accordance with ORS
571.330 and any rules adopted pursuant to ORS 571.330;
(b) If the hemp commodity or product is intended for human consumption by  ingestion,
the hemp commodity or product was processed in a  facility licensed by the State Department
of Agriculture  under ORS 616.695 to 616.755 or in a facility in another state or jurisdiction
that meets requirements substantially  similar to requirements established under ORS 616.695
to 616.755;
(c) The person obtains and maintains documentation of the results of the testing;
(d) If the industrial hemp commodity or product is sold to a person under 21  years of age
or any representations  are made to the consumer about the concentration of
delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, the results of the testing required under this  subsection dem-
onstrate the concentration of delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol;
(e) The industrial hemp commodity or product  does not contain more than 0.3 percent
tetrahydrocannabinol or the  concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol allowed under federal
law, whichever is greater; and
(f) The industrial hemp commodity or product does not exceed the concentration  of adult
use cannabinoids established by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, in conjunction with
the Oregon Health Authority and State Department of Agriculture, by rule.
(3) The testing required under subsection (2) of this section may be conducted only by:
(a) A laboratory licensed by the commission under ORS 475B.560 and accredited by  the
authority under ORS 475B.565; or
(b) If the industrial  hemp commodity or product was processed outside of this state, a
laboratory accredited to the same or more stringent standards as a laboratory described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(4) A person may not sell or deliver an adult  use cannabis item to a person under 21
years of age.
(5) This section does not apply to the retail sale  of industrial hemp commodities or products by
a marijuana retailer, as defined in ORS 475B.015, that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 571.345 is amended to read:
571.345. The State Department of Agriculture may  by rule or order establish a process providing
for the remediation of a violation of ORS 571.330 or 571.333 that is  committed by a grower or han-
dler [ registered ] licensed under ORS 571.281 and is not committed intentionally.
SECTION 33a.  ORS 571.348 is amended to read:
571.348. (1) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the State Department of Agriculture
may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500 on a person for violating:
(a) A provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348;
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 23
(b) A rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348; or
(c) An order issued by the department pursuant to  a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348 or a
rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348.
(2) In addition to the penalty described in subsection (1)  of this section, subject to the
provisions of ORS chapter 183, the department may impose a civil  penalty not to exceed
$10,000 on a person if the  person is a grower registered under ORS 571.281 and the depart-
ment determines that the person’s industrial hemp  crop contains an average
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of at least 10 percent on a dry weight basis.
[(2)] (3) The department may not discipline a person under this section on the basis that pos-
sessing, delivering and manufacturing industrial hemp are prohibited by federal law.
[(3)] (4) All moneys collected by the  department under this section shall be deposited in the
General Fund in the State  Treasury to the credit of the Industrial Hemp Fund established under
ORS 571.278.
SECTION 33b.
 ORS 571.348, as amended by section 33a of this 2021 Act, is amended to read:
571.348. (1) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the State Department of Agriculture
may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500 on a person for violating:
(a) A provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348;
(b) A rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348; or
(c) An order issued by the department pursuant to a  provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348 or a
rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.260 to 571.348.
(2) In addition to the penalty described  in subsection (1) of this section, subject to the provisions
of ORS chapter 183,  the department may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 on a person
if the person is a grower  [ registered ] licensed under ORS 571.281 and the department determines
that the person’s industrial hemp crop contains an average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of
at least 10 percent on a dry weight basis.
(3) The department may not discipline a person under this section on the basis that  possessing,
delivering and manufacturing industrial hemp are prohibited by federal law.
(4) All moneys collected by the department under this section shall be  deposited in the General
Fund in the  State Treasury to the credit of the Industrial Hemp Fund established under ORS
571.278.
SECTION 34.
ORS 571.341 is repealed.
SECTION 35. The State  Department of Agriculture shall issue a license to grow or handle
hemp under ORS 571.281 on the date the previous registration is due for renewal to a  grower
or handler who:
(1) Registered under ORS 571.281 on or before  the operative date specified in section 36
of this 2021 Act; and
(2) Meets the requirements for registration renewal.
SECTION 36.
(1) Sections 14 to 17 of this 2021 Act, the amendments to ORS  571.260,
571.263, 571.281, 571.285, 571.288, 571.294, 571.302, 571.327, 571.330,  571.336, 571.337, 571.339,
571.345 and 571.348 by sections 19, 20,  23 to 33 and 33b of this 2021 Act, the amendments to
sections 18 to 18c of this 2021 Act by sections 18d to  18g of this 2021 Act and the repeal of
ORS 571.341 by section 34 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon  Health Authority, the Oregon Liquor Control Commission and the State
Department of Agriculture may take any action before the operative date specified in  sub-
section (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the authority, the commission and  the
department to exercise, on and after the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on  the authority, the commission
and the department  by sections 14 to 17 of this 2021 Act, the amendments to ORS 571.260,
571.263, 571.281, 571.285, 571.288, 571.294, 571.302, 571.327, 571.330,  571.336, 571.337, 571.339,
571.345 and 571.348 by sections 19, 20,  23 to 33 and 33b of this 2021 Act, the amendments to
sections 18 to 18c of this 2021 Act by sections 18d to  18g of this 2021 Act and the repeal of
ORS 571.341 by section 34 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 24
TASK FORCE ON CANNABIS-DERIVED INTOXICANTS
SECTION 37. (1) The Task Force on Cannabis-Derived Intoxicants is established.
(2) The task force consists of 15 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint  one member from among the members of
the Senate;
(b) The Senate Minority Leader shall  appoint one member from among the members of
the Senate;
(c) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from  among
the members of the House of Representatives;
(d) The House Minority Leader shall appoint one member  from among the members of
the House of Representatives; and
(e) The Governor shall appoint 11 members as follows:
(A) One member who represents counties in this state;
(B) One member who represents cities in this state;
(C) One member who represents law enforcement agencies;
(D) One member  who represents industrial hemp growers registered or licensed under
ORS 571.281;
(E) One member who represents industrial hemp  handlers registered or licensed under
ORS 571.281;
(F) The director of the Oregon State University Global Hemp Innovation Center,  or a
designee of the director;
(G) Two members who represent licensees, as defined in ORS 475B.015;
(H) The Director of Agriculture, or a designee of the director;
(I) The director of the Oregon Health Authority  Public Health Division, or a designee of
the director; and
(J) The administrator of the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, or  a designee of the
administrator.
(3) The task force shall consider:
(a) Changes to state law to support  the regulation of intoxicating cannabis-derived pro-
ducts and artificially derived cannabinoids;
(b) The consolidation of administrative functions related to the regulation of cannabis;
(c) Methods to prevent  sales to minors of industrial hemp commodities or products that
contain intoxicating cannabinoids;
(d) Regulation to address genetic engineering of cannabis;
(e) Testing requirements and  methods of enforcement of testing requirements for
cannabinoids, including artificially derived cannabinoids, to protect the public  health and
safety;
(f) Policy changes related to interstate commerce and transportation of cannabis;
(g) Changes to state regulation of cannabis as a result of federal laws; and
(h) Input from marijuana and industrial hemp industry members.
(4) A majority of the members of the  task force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the  members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 25
(10) Not later than June 30, 2022, the State Department of Agriculture  shall report to the
task force on the implementation of section 18 of this 2021 Act.
(11)(a) The task force shall submit a report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
shall include initial findings and recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly related  to economic development no later than December 31,
2021.
(b) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and shall
include final findings and recommendations for legislation, to  the interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to economic development no later than December 31, 2022. The
report submitted under this paragraph must include a summary of the information  submit-
ted to the task force by the department under subsection (10) of this section.
(12) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission and the State Department of Agriculture,
in consultation with  the Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Revenue, shall
provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 38.
Section 37 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
ILLEGAL MARIJUANA MARKET ENFORCEMENT
GRANT PROGRAM FUNDING
SECTION 39.  Section 16, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 16.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS 475B.759, before making  any other distribution from the
Oregon Marijuana Account established under ORS 475B.759, the  Department of Revenue shall first
distribute quarterly from the account the following:
(a) $875,000 to the  Oregon Liquor Control Commission for deposit in the Marijuana Control and
Regulation Fund established under ORS 475B.296; and
(b) [ $375,000] $750,000 to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission for  deposit into the Illegal
Marijuana Market Enforcement Grant Program Fund established under section  15 [ of this 2018
Act], chapter 103,  Oregon Laws 2018,  for the purposes of paying the costs incurred by the com-
mission in carrying out the provisions of section 13 [ of this 2018 Act ], chapter 103, Oregon  Laws
2018.
(2) The final distribution made  under subsection (1) of this section shall be made in the fiscal
quarter beginning on October 1, 2023.
ENFORCEMENT
SECTION 40. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall, with the  assistance of the
State Department of Agriculture, create and  continually update a map of the locations of
industrial hemp operations registered or licensed under ORS 571.281 and  premises for which
a license has been issued under ORS 475B.070.
(2) The commission shall make the map  described in subsection (1) of this section avail-
able to law enforcement agencies in this state and public employees  and officials who are
responsible for the enforcement of state  and local laws regulating industrial hemp or
marijuana.
SECTION 41. (1) A person commits the crime of unlawful production of marijuana if the
person produces marijuana or industrial hemp:
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 26
(a) At a location that is not confirmed by the Oregon Health Authority, the Oregon  Liq-
uor Control Commission or the State Department of Agriculture to be the location  of an
industrial hemp operation registered or licensed under ORS 571.281, a premises  for which a
license was  issued under ORS 475B.090 or a marijuana grow site registered under ORS
475B.810; and
(b) In an amount that is not allowed by state law.
(2) Unlawful production of marijuana is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) Marijuana or industrial hemp that is unlawfully produced,  as described in subsection
(1) of this section, is considered contraband and may be  destroyed by a law enforcement
agency.
SECTION 41a.
(1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission, in consultation with the State
Department of Agriculture, shall develop by rule  a methodology to distinguish whether a
cannabis plant is marijuana or industrial hemp for purposes of sections 40 to  44 of this 2021
Act. The methodology must include testing criteria and cannabinoid concentrations  above
which immature or mature cannabis plants are presumptively considered to be marijuana.
(2) The department may order a person registered or licensed  under ORS 571.281 to de-
stroy any cannabis plants  located at an industrial hemp operation for which the person de-
scribed in this subsection is responsible  if the cannabis plants are presumptively considered
to be marijuana under the methodology adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 42. (1) The State Department of Agriculture may enter into an interagency
agreement with the Oregon  Liquor Control Commission to allow representatives of the
commission to carry out inspections of industrial hemp crops under ORS 571.281 (7).
(2) The department and the commission may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 43.
(1) Pursuant to rules adopted by the State Department of Agriculture under
subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Law enforcement officers may accompany the department to an industrial hemp op-
eration for the purposes of providing protection for the department’s representatives; and
(b) Public employees and officials who  are responsible for the enforcement of state and
local laws may accompany the department to an industrial  hemp operation in order to carry
out inspections that the public employees or officials are authorized to perform.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 44.
The Governor may order that the Oregon National  Guard provide assist-
ance and support  to the State Department of Agriculture and law enforcement in carrying
out inspections of industrial hemp  crops under ORS 571.281 (7) and other duties of the de-
partment related to the enforcement of ORS 571.260 to 571.348.
SECTION 45. Sections 40 to 44 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 1, 2024.
FISCAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established  by section 1 (2), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5018), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor  Control Commission for
marijuana regulation - recreational, is increased by $399,007.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter __, Oregon  Laws 2021 (En-
rolled House Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for health systems, health
policy and analytics, and public health, is increased by $730,917.
SECTION 48. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter __, Oregon  Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5005),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 27
fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery
funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission,
is increased by $3,000,000 for additional  Illegal Marijuana Market Enforcement Grant Pro-
gram grants.
OPERATIVE DATE FOR INTRASTATE DELIVERY PROVISIONS
SECTION 49.  Section 8, chapter 155, Oregon  Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2519), is amended
to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) Sections 2 and 3 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 155, Oregon Laws 2021,  and  the
amendments to ORS 475B.206, 475B.220, 475B.261 and 475B.301 by sections 4 to 7 [ of this 2021
Act], chapter 155 Oregon Laws 2021,  become operative on January 1, [ 2020] 2022.
(2) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission may take any action before the  operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to  enable the commission to exercise, on
or after the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the commission by sections 2 and 3 [ of this 2021  Act ], chapter 155, Oregon
Laws 2021, and the amendments to ORS 475B.206,  475B.220, 475B.261 and 475B.301 by sections 4 to
7 [of this 2021 Act ], chapter 155, Oregon Laws 2021 .
CAPTIONS
SECTION 50. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 51. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 28
Passed by House June 21, 2021
Repassed by House June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3000 (HB 3000-D) Page 29